Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201644-9108
Failure to file corporate governance annual disclosure; forfeiture; suspension of certificate of authority.

Any insurer failing, without just cause, to timely file the corporate governance annual disclosure as required in the Corporate Governance Annual Disclosure Act shall forfeit fifty dollars each day thereafter such failure continues. The maximum forfeit shall not exceed ten thousand dollars. In addition to the forfeiture, the director may suspend, after notice and hearing, the certificate of authority of the insurer until it has complied with the act. The director may reduce the forfeiture if the insurer demonstrates to the director that the forfeiture would constitute a financial hardship to the insurer. The director shall remit any forfeiture collected pursuant to this section to the State Treasurer for distribution in accordance with Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska.

Laws 2016, LB772, § 8.
January 1, 2017